Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6513 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Corporation Commission shall establish minimum
fire safety standards which require charging station operators who
provide access to electric vehicle charging equipment housed in
multistory buildings to comply with the provisions of this section.


Req. No. 12380 Page 1

B. The Oklahoma Corporation Commission shall promulgate rules
to implement the provisions of this section which shall, at minimum,
include the following:
1. Require charging station operators to comply with minimum
fire safety standards based on industry-best practices for the
design, installation, and continued operation of electric vehicle
charging equipment housed in multistory buildings;
2. Require charging station operators to comply with the
following minimum fire safety standards for electric vehicle
charging equipment as follows:
a. electric vehicle charging stations shall be housed on
the ground floor of any multilevel structure,
b. electric vehicle charging stations shall be housed no
more than twenty-five (25) feet from an entry point to
a multilevel structure accessible by a public right-
of-way or by a private drive accessible from a public
right-of-way,
c. installation of signage at all points of egress for a
parking structure indicating Oklahoma Corporation
Commission registration number for the charging
station operator, locations of electric vehicle
charging stations and emergency contact for charging
station operator listed in subparagraph h of this

Req. No. 12380 Page 2

paragraph and emergency call box listed in
subparagraph d of this paragraph,
d. installation of one emergency call box and one ten-
pound Class C fire extinguisher no more than twenty-
five (25) feet from electric vehicle charging
stations,
e. installation of sufficient lighting in accordance with
Chapter 10 of the Oklahoma International Building
Code,
f. installation of a fire alarm system with notification
capability in accordance with Chapter 10 of the
Oklahoma International Building Code,
g. installation of continuous video surveillance with
seventy-two-hour recall capability in the immediate
vicinity of electric vehicle charging stations, and
h. designation of emergency contact for charging station
operator with contact information for both business
hours and after-hours emergencies;
3. Require annual reports be filed by charging station
operators in accordance with OAC 165:14-3-5 attesting that
continuous compliance of requirements in this section have been
fulfilled;
4. Require third-party inspections in accordance with Section
6509 of this title;
Req. No. 12380 Page 3

5. Promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section
and to set fees necessary to carry out the duties and
responsibilities of the Commission pursuant to this section.
C. If a charging station operator fails to meet the
requirements of this section or any rules promulgated to implement
the requirements of this section, the charging station operator
shall be subject to an administrative penalty from the Oklahoma
Corporation Commission not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)
per day, per violation as provided by law.
D. All fees, fines, or assessments collected through the
provisions of this section shall be deposited into the Oklahoma
Corporation Commission Revolving Fund created in Section 180.7 of
Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12380 JBH 02/05/25








Req. No. 12380 Page 4